src/fst/affixes/numerals.lexc
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL 
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ;                  
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                      
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; 
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;           
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;           
!        +Sg+Com:jn K ;          
        +Sg+Par:t  K ; 
        
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ; 
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;  
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;             

LEXICON GIETJAV
              :ja%>    GIETJAV-IE ;          
              :ja%>Q1  GIETJAV-OBL ; !weak grade cases     
 +Der/akti+Adv:tji%>   K ;

LEXICON GIETJAV-IE  
  +Sg+Ill:j K ;        
    +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Nom:  K ; !giehtja                

LEXICON GIETJAV-OBL         
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:v  K ; !in Spiik, OK and AK giehtja nom
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:   K ; ! ???                           
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                             
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ;              
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;              
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;              
        +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
        +Sg+Par:t  K ; 
        
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ; 
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;  
   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;    
                     
        +Pl+Nom: K ;               
        +Pl+Gen:j K ;              
        +Pl+Acc:jt K ;             
        +Pl+Ill:jda K ;            
        +Pl+Ine:jn K ;             
        +Pl+Ela:js K ;             
        +Pl+Com:j K ;              
 
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV
              :ja%> ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE ;          
              :ja%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL ;       
 +Der/akti+Adv:tji%>   K ;
                            
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE  
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;        
! +Ess:n K ;
                        
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL         
! +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:v  K ;
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                             
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ;              
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;              
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;              
!        +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
        +Sg+Par:t  K ;              

   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ; 
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;  
!   +Sg+Com+Attr:jn K ;    

LEXICON GÁKTSA              
                     GÁKTSA- ; !gáktsa   
              :e%>Q1 GÁVTSE- ; !gávtse          
              :i%>Q1 GÁVTSI- ; !gávtsi                   
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K       ;
 
LEXICON GÁKTSA-             
          +Sg+Nom:%>a  K ;   
   +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%>e  K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized                        
   +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%>a  K ;              
          +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;             
             +Ess:a%>n K ;   
      +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K ; ! not sure about the e-ending, dont think its standardized 
                               
LEXICON GÁVTSE-   
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ; !in OK, but standardized?                      
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                            
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;             
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;             
        +Sg+Par:t  K ;
        
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;  
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;     

        +Pl+Nom:   K ;              

LEXICON GÁVTSI-        
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;   

      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;             
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;            
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;            
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;            
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;             

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA
                     ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA- ; 
              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE- ; 
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K       ;
  !:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI- ;                       

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA-             
!        +Sg+Nom:%>a K ;   
! +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:%>e K ;                         
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:%>a K ;              
        +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;             
!           +Ess:a%>n K ;   
!    +Ess+Use/NG:e%>n K ;   
                            
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE-   
       +Sg+Acc:v  K ;                       
       +Sg+Gen:   K ;                         
       +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
       +Sg+Ine:n  K ;             
       +Sg+Ela:s  K ;             
       +Sg+Par:t  K ; 
 
  +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;  
  +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
  +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;              

!LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI-        
!      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
! +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;                  

LEXICON AKTSE
                     AKTS-  ; 
              :e%>Q1 AVTSE- ;           
              :i%>Q1 AVTSI- ;                       
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K      ;
 
LEXICON AKTS-           
         +Sg+Nom:e%>  K ;          
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:e%>  K ;          
         +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;         
            +Ess:e%>n  K ; 

LEXICON AVTSE- 
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ; !in OK, but standardized?                 
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                   
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;         
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;         
        +Sg+Par:t  K ; 
  
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;  
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;        
                
        +Pl+Nom:   K ;          

LEXICON AVTSI-         
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;   
         
      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;         
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;        
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;       
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;        
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;        
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;         

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTSE
                     ẈG-LÅK-AKTS- ;  
              :e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE- ;           
              :i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI- ;                      
 +Der/akti+Adv:i%>   K       ;
 
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTS-           
!        +Sg+Nom:e%>  K ;          
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:e%>  K ;          
        +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;         
!           +Ess:e%>n K ;     

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE- 
        +Sg+Acc:v  K ;                    
        +Sg+Gen:   K ;                          
        +Cmp/SgGen:   NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Ine:n  K ;         
        +Sg+Ela:s  K ;         
        +Sg+Par:t  K ;     
        
   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;  
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;                
            
!        +Pl+Nom:   K ;          

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI-         
!      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
! +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;   
       
      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;         
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;        
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;       
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;        
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;        
!      +Pl+Com:j   K ;         

LEXICON LÅGEV
                      LÅHK- ; !låhk- 
               :e%>Q1 LÅGE- ; !låge-  
               :i%>Q1 LÅGI- ; !lågi-  
  +Der/akti+Adv:ki%>  K     ;
LEXICON LÅHK-   
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NG:e%>  K ;     
 +Sg+Ill:å%>j K ;    
    +Ess:e%>n K ;     
                 
LEXICON LÅGE-      
        +Sg+Nom:v K ; !in Spiik, but AK & gielaj hilá låhke   
        +Sg+Acc:v K ;    
        +Sg+Gen:  K ;                             
        +Cmp/SgGen:  NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
        +Sg+Ine:n K ;    
        +Sg+Ela:s K ;    
        +Sg+Par:t K ;  

   +Sg+Ill+Attr:   K ;  
   +Sg+Ine+Attr:n  K ;  
   +Sg+Ela+Attr:t  K ;  
  
        +Pl+Nom:   K ;     

LEXICON LÅGI-      
      +Sg+Com:jn  K ;
 +Sg+Com+Attr:jn  K ;    
 
      +Pl+Gen:j   K ;    
      +Pl+Acc:jt  K ;   
      +Pl+Ill:jda K ;  
      +Pl+Ine:jn  K ;   
      +Pl+Ela:js  K ;   
      +Pl+Com:j   K ;       
                   
!Old counting system. Removed from speller, use/-spell tagged in lexicon LÅGENAN
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN
 :%> AKTALÅGENAN-NIE ;  
 :%>Q1 AKTALÅGENAN-OBL ;      
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-NIE    
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;     
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;        
                   
