src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON 2TO9F
giehtja+Num+CmpN/SgG:gieht GIETJAV ;
gáktsa+Num+CmpN/SgG:gákts GÁKTSA ;
gáktsa+Num+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgG:gáks GÁKTSA ;
aktse+Num+CmpN/SgG:akts AKTSE ;
LEXICON LÅGENAN
lågenangiehtja+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gieht GIETJAV ;
lågenangáktsa+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#gákts GÁKTSA ;
lågenanaktse+v1+Num+CmpN/SgG:lågenan#akts AKTSE ;
lågenanakta+v2+Num+Use/-Spell:akta AKTALÅGENAN ;   !old
